Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1305
Exposing offensive matter; penalty.

Whoever shall put the carcass of any dead animal, the offals from any slaughter house, butcher's establishment, packing house, or fish house, any spoiled meats, spoiled fish, or putrid animal substance, or the contents of any privy vault upon or into any river, bay, creek, pond, canal, road, street, alley, lot, field, meadow, public ground, market space, or common, or whoever, being the owner or owners or occupant or occupants thereof, shall knowingly permit the same to remain in any of the aforesaid situations, to the annoyance of the citizens of this state, or any of them, or shall neglect or refuse to remove or abate the nuisance occasioned thereby within twenty-four hours after knowledge of the existence of such nuisance upon any of the above-described premises owned or occupied by him, her, or them, or after notice thereof in writing from the street commissioner, supervisor, or any trustee or health officer of any city or precinct in which such nuisance shall exist, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. If the nuisance is not abated within twenty-four hours thereafter, it shall be deemed a second offense against the provisions of this section, and every like neglect of each twenty-four hours thereafter shall be considered an additional offense.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 289;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 21.